Florida, session 2026, SB1618.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 19 20 Section 1.âSection 394.45735, Florida Statutes, is created 21 to read: 22 394.45735âCoordinated Access Model Pilot Program.â 23 (1)âThe Department of Children and Families shall contract 24 with local entities to establish and operate a behavioral health 25 Coordinated Access Model Pilot Program in the departmentâs 26 Northeast Region, including Clay, Duval, and St. Johns Counties, 27 to improve timely access to behavioral health services using a 28 single point of entry. 29 (2)âThe contracted entities must have experience in all of 30 the following: 31 (a)âBuilding resource networks, including behavioral health 32 providers, community-based organizations, and government and 33 social services. 34 (b)âConnecting individuals requesting assistance with 35 resources through a coordinated care network. 36 (c)âHosting a platform that supports closed-loop referrals 37 and extensive program metrics. 38 (3)âThe contracted entities shall subcontract with a state 39 university that is not designated pursuant to s. 1001.7065(3), 40 to provide allied health staff and undergraduate and graduate 41 social work and health professions training and internship 42 experiences to interact with and screen individuals contacting 43 the network access point for assistance. 44 (4)âThe department and contracted entities shall create a 45 coordinated access model which shall: 46 (a)âCoordinate access to behavioral health services among 47 multiple service providers and social service entities for 48 individuals requesting assistance. 49 (b)âProvide timely referral, provider navigation, and 50 connection to appropriate levels of care using a single, 51 electronic referral and resource platform capable of 52 coordinating among multiple providers. 53 (5)âThe coordinated access model must include, at a 54 minimum: 55 (a)âA network access point available during standard 56 business hours with options for telephone, web-based, and in 57 person intakes. 58 (b)âStandardized screening and referral tools to identify 59 service needs and eligibility for available programs. 60 (c)âReferral coordination and warm handoffs to providers, 61 including scheduling of first appointments and follow-up 62 confirmation. 63 (d)âNavigation and follow-up support to ensure successful 64 engagement with referred services. 65 (e)âService directory and inventory of community-based 66 providers, maintained in real time to the extent practicable. 67 (f)âCoordination with community systems, including primary 68 care providers, schools, social services, and local governments. 69 (g)âUse of a data platform that enables standardized data 70 collection and reporting on referral outcomes, timeliness of 71 service connections, consumer experience, and identification of 72 service system gaps. The data platform must: 73 1.âSupport the potential integration with other state and 74 local data systems, including, but not limited to, Medicaid, 75 managing entities, school-based services, and community health 76 systems. 77 2.âFacilitate data sharing and interoperability in 78 compliance with applicable state and federal privacy laws, 79 including the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability 80 Act of 1996 and 42 C.F.R. part 2. 81 3.âProvide a comprehensive view of service utilization and 82 coordination across providers, payors, and community partners. 83 4.âEnable the department to evaluate system performance, 84 identify barriers, and inform future resource allocation. 85 (6)âThe coordinated access model shall include measurable 86 performance outcomes, including, but not limited to, all of the 87 following: 88 (a)âTimeliness of referrals and service connections. 89 (b)âSuccessful engagement rates with referred services. 90 (c)âReduction in duplication of intake assessments. 91 (d)âImproved consumer and family satisfaction. 92 (7)(a)âUntil the program is fully implemented, the 93 department shall provide reports of the status of the 94 Coordinated Access Model Pilot Program quarterly to the 95 Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the 96 House of Representatives. 97 (b)âBy November 30, 2027, and annually thereafter, the 98 department shall assess the effectiveness of the pilot program 99 and submit a report to the Governor, the President of the 100 Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives. 101 (8)âThe department and contracted entities may apply for 102 and use any funds from private, state, and federal grants to 103 support or expand coordinated access models. 104 (9)âThe department may adopt rules to administer this 105 section. 106 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.